Georgia, session 2025_26, HB724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to amend, consolidate, create, revise, and supersede the several Acts incorporating
the City of Pembroke, approved March 28, 1985 (Ga. L. 1985, p. 4846), as amended, is
amended by revising Section 4 as follows:
"Section 4.
The next general election for mayor and five city council members shall be held on the first
Tuesday in November, 2027, at which time a mayor and five city council members shall
be elected to take office on the second Monday in January, 2028, for a term of four years
and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, successors shall be elected
at the municipal general election which shall be held every four years on the first Tuesday
H. B. 724
- 1 -

LC 62 0133/AP
in November, and such successors shall take office on the second Monday in January
following such municipal general election. The terms of the currently elected mayor and
five city council members shall remain in effect until their successors are elected and
qualified."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 724
- 2 -